Hawaii statutes.
§465D-6 Fees; disposition. (a) Upon
issuance of a new license and at each license renewal period, each behavior
analyst shall pay, in addition to a license fee or renewal fee, a surcharge of $50,
which shall be maintained in a separate account within the compliance
resolution fund established pursuant to section 26-9(o). At the end of each
quarter, the moneys contained in the separate account established pursuant to
this section shall be transferred to the compliance resolution fund until such
time that the total transferred amounts equal the amount appropriated in
section 5 of Act 199, Session Laws of Hawaii 2015. Thereafter, no surcharge
shall be assessed, and any funds in excess of the amount appropriated in
section 5 of Act 199, Session Laws of Hawaii 2015, shall be deposited into the
compliance resolution fund.

(b) Application fees paid pursuant to this
chapter shall not be refundable. Pursuant to section 26-9(l), the director
shall establish examination, reexamination, license, renewal, restoration,
enforcement, and other fees relating to the administration of this chapter by
rule.

(c) Fees assessed pursuant to this chapter
shall be used to defray costs incurred by the department in implementing this
chapter. [L 2015, c 199, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 123, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next